North Carolina statutes. Chapter 96. Employment Security.
Article 1. Definitions and Funds.
§ 96-5.
Employment Security Administration Fund.

Fund Established. — The Employment Security Administration Fund is created as a special revenue fund. The fund consists of the following:

Monies appropriated by this State.

Monies received from the United States or another source for the administration of this Chapter.

Monies received from any agency of the United States or any other state as compensation for services or facilities supplied to the agency or state.

Monies received pursuant to any surety bond or insurance policy or from other sources for losses sustained by the Employment Security Administration Fund or by reason of damage to equipment or supplies purchased from monies in the fund.

Proceeds realized from the sale or disposition of equipment or supplies purchased from monies in the fund.

Use of Fund. — Monies in the Employment Security Administration Fund may be used by the Division only to administer this Chapter. Monies received in the fund from a source other than an appropriation by the General Assembly are appropriated for the purpose
of administering this Chapter. The Secretary is authorized to requisition and receive from the State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund any monies standing to the State’s credit that are permitted by federal law to be used
for administering this Chapter and to expend the monies for this purpose, without regard to a determination of necessity by a federal agency.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-2, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2013.

(c1)
Repealed by Session Laws 2004-124, s. 13.7B(b), effective July 20, 2004.

through (g) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-2, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 13; 1941, c. 108, ss. 12, 13; 1947, c. 326, s. 5; c. 598, s. 1; 1949, c. 424, s. 2; 1951, c. 332, s. 18; 1953, c. 401, ss. 1, 5; 1977, c. 727, ss. 11-13; 1981, c. 160, s. 2; 1987, c. 17, ss. 1, 2;
1991, c. 689, s. 142; 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 6, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 608, s. 2; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 26.6; 2004-124, s. 13.7B(b); 2005-276, s. 6.37(h); 2006-203, s. 22; 2011-401, s. 2.4; 2013-2, s. 1(a), (b); 2013-224,
s. 19.

§ 96-5.1.
Supplemental Employment Security Administration Fund.

Fund Established. — The Supplemental Employment Security Administration Fund is created as a special revenue fund. The fund consists of all interest and penalties paid under this Chapter by employers on overdue contributions and any appropriations made
to the fund by the General Assembly. Penalties collected on unpaid taxes imposed by this section must be transferred to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund established in

G.S. 115C-457.1

.

Use of Funds. — Monies in the Supplemental Employment Security Administration Fund may be used by the Division only for one or more of the purposes listed below and may not be used in lieu of federal funds made available to the Division for the administration
of this Chapter:

The payment of costs and charges of administration that the Secretary of Labor determines are not eligible for payment from or were improperly paid from the Employment Security Administration Fund. The Supplemental Employment Security Administration Fund
must reimburse the Employment Security Administration Fund for the amount of any improper payment. If the balance in the Supplemental Fund is insufficient, the Secretary must notify the Governor, who must request an appropriation
for that purpose.

The temporary stabilization of federal funds cash flow.

Security for loans from the Unemployment Trust Fund.

The refund of an overpayment of interest previously credited to the fund. If an employer takes credit for a previous overpayment of interest when remitting contributions, the amount of credit taken for the overpayment of interest must be reimbursed to
the Unemployment Insurance Fund.

History.
2013-2, s. 1(b); 2013-224, ss. 3, 19.

§ 96-6.
Unemployment Insurance Fund.

Establishment and Use. — The Unemployment Insurance Fund is established as an enterprise fund. The Division must administer the fund solely for the payment of unemployment compensation as that term is defined by section 3306(h) of the Code, exclusive
of expenses of administration, and for refunds of sums erroneously paid into the fund. No money in the fund may be used, directly or indirectly, to pay interest on an advance received from the Unemployment Trust Fund.This fund
consists of the following sources of revenue:

Contributions collected under this Chapter.

Property or securities acquired through the use of monies belonging to the fund.

Interest and investment earnings of the fund.

Monies received from this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund in accordance with Title XII of the Social Security Act, as amended.

Monies credited to this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to section 903 of Title IX of the Social Security Act, as amended.

Monies paid to this State pursuant to section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970.

Reimbursement payments in lieu of contributions.

Any federally mandated penalty amount assessed under G.S. 96-18(h).

Amounts transferred from the Unemployment Insurance Reserve Fund.

Accounts. — The State Treasurer must maintain within the fund three separate accounts:

A clearing account.

An unemployment trust fund account.

A benefit account.

(b1)

Clearing Account. —
The Division must credit monies payable to the Unemployment Insurance Fund to the clearing account. The Controller must immediately deposit amounts in the clearing account with the secretary of the treasury
of the United States to the credit of the account of this State in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

(b2)

Unemployment Trust Fund Account. —
The unemployment trust fund account consists of monies requisitioned from the State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund to make refunds of overpayments of contributions. To obtain funds needed to
make refunds, the Controller must requisition the amount needed from the Unemployment Trust Fund and credit the amount received to this account.

Benefit Account. — The benefit account consists of monies requisitioned from the State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund to pay benefits. To obtain funds to pay benefits under this Chapter, the Controller must requisition the amount needed from
the State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund and credit the amount received to this account. Warrants for the payment of benefits are payable from this account. Amounts in the benefit account that are not needed to pay the
benefits for which they were requisitioned may be applied to the payment of benefits for succeeding periods or, in the discretion of the Controller, deposited to the credit of the State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

Discontinuance of Unemployment Trust Fund. — If the Unemployment Trust Fund or the State’s account within the federal Fund ceases to exist, the credit balance of the State’s account in that Fund must be transferred to the Unemployment Insurance Fund
and credited to the benefit account.

, (f) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-2, s. 1(b), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, ss. 9, 18; 1939, c. 27, s. 7; c. 52, s. 4; c. 208; 1941, c. 108; 1945, c. 522, s. 4; 1947, c. 326, s. 6; 1953, c. 401, ss. 1, 6; 1959, c. 362, s. 1; 1961, c. 454, ss. 1-3; 1969, c. 575, s. 3; 1971,
c. 673, ss. 3, 4; 1985, c. 197, s. 2; 2006-66, s. 6.19(a); 2006-203, s. 23; 2006-221, s. 3A; 2006-259, s. 40(a); 2011-401, s. 2.5; 2012-134, s. 3(e); 2013-2, s. 1(b); 2013-224, s. 19; 2013-391, s. 1.

§ 96-6.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed pursuant to the terms of G.S. 96-6.1(c), effective with respect to calendar quarters beginning on or after January 1, 2011.

History.
1999-321, s. 2; 2001-424, ss. 30.5(e), 30.5(f); 2005-276, ss. 8.8(a), 8.8(b), 6.37(i); 2006-203, s. 24.

§ 96-6.2.
Unemployment Insurance Reserve Fund.

Establishment and Use. — The Unemployment Insurance Reserve Fund is established as an enterprise fund. The Fund consists of the revenues derived from the surtax imposed under

G.S. 96-9.7

. Monies in the Fund may be used only for the following purposes:

Interest payments required on advances under Title XII of the Social Security Act.

Principal payments on advances under Title XII of the Social Security Act.

Transfers to the Unemployment Insurance Fund for payment of benefits.

Administrative costs for the collection of the surtax.

Refunds of the surtax.

Fund Capped. — The balance in the Unemployment Insurance Reserve Fund on January 1 of any year may not exceed the greater of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or the amount of interest paid the previous September on advances under Title XII of the
Social Security Act. Any amount in the fund that exceeds the cap must be transferred to the Unemployment Insurance Fund.

History.
2013-2, s. 1(b); 2013-224, ss. 4, 19.

§ 96-7.
Representation in court.

In any civil action to enforce the provisions of this Chapter, the Secretary, the Department, and the State may be represented by any qualified attorney who is designated by it for this purpose.

All criminal actions for violation of any provision of this Chapter, or of any rules or regulations issued pursuant thereto, shall be prosecuted as now provided by law by the district attorney or by the prosecuting attorney of any county or city in which
the violation occurs.

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 17; 1937, c. 150; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 2011-401, s. 2.6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 2.6, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “the Secretary, the Department” for “the Commission” in subsection (a).